South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3116.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 6, Title 48 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 48-6-90. (A) Within one hundred eighty days of the effective date of this section, the Department of Environmental Services shall promulgate regulations prohibiting the discharge of any contaminant level of perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances, including perfluorooctanoic acid and perfluorooctane sulfonate, in any waterway or drinking water supply of the State. (B) The department may enforce the provisions of this section in accordance with Section 48-6-70 and any other applicable provision of law, and may coordinate with the Department of Public Health, the Department of Agriculture, and the Department of Commerce in enforcing this section. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect July 1, 2025. ----XX----